Nevada, session 83, AB118.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 125C of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 and 3 of this act.
Sec. 2. 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a
court shall not order a child to enroll or participate in a family
reunification treatment, program or service that, as a condition of
enrollment or participation, requires or results in:
(a) The issuance of an order prohibiting contact between the
child and a member of his or her immediate family;
(b) The child staying at a place other than his or her home
overnight or leaving this State;
(c) The transfer of legal custody or physical custody of the
child;
(d) The use or threatened use of force, physical obstruction,
intimidation, coercion or verbal abuse; or
(e) The isolation of the child from his or her family or
community.
2. As used in this section, “family reunification treatment,
program or service” means a treatment, program or service
intended to facilitate or encourage a relationship between a child
and an estranged or rejected parent or other member of his or her
immediate family. The term includes, without limitation, a
treatment, program or service provided by a camp, workshop,
therapeutic vacation or educational program.
Sec. 3. 1. The Court Administrator shall arrange for the
giving of instruction, at the National Council of Juvenile and
Family Court Judges in Reno, Nevada, or elsewhere, in a course
designed to improve the ability of a court to:
(a) Recognize and respond to child abuse, domestic violence
and trauma in a manner that is culturally sensitive and
appropriate for diverse communities; and
(b) Make child custody decisions that prioritize the safety and
well-being of children.
2. The instruction required by subsection 1 must:
(a) Be made available to judges and other persons who, during
the scope of their employment, have regular and routine contact
with persons who are involved in child custody proceedings or
-
*AB118*

– 3 –
proceedings relating to domestic violence, including, without
limitation, guardians ad litem, mediators and employees of the
court; and
(b) Comply with any applicable requirements of the Violence
Against Women Act Reauthorization Act of 2022, Pub. L. No. 117-
103, 34 U.S.C. § 12291 et seq.
3. On or before January 1 of each year, the Court
Administrator shall prepare and submit to the Director of the
Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmittal to Legislature, or if the
Legislature is not in session, the Joint Interim Standing
Committee on the Judiciary, an annual report concerning the
instruction provided pursuant to this section. The report must
include, without limitation:
(a) The title of any course offered by the National Council of
Juvenile and Family Court Judges in the immediately preceding
year that satisfies the requirements of subsection 2; and
(b) The number of persons who attended each such course.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Child custody proceeding” means a proceeding in which
legal custody, physical custody or visitation with respect to a child
is at issue. The term:
(1) Includes a proceeding for divorce, separation, paternity,
child support, termination of parental rights and protection from
domestic violence in which the issue may appear.
(2) Does not include a delinquency proceeding conducted
pursuant to title 5 of NRS or a proceeding held pursuant to
chapter 432B of NRS.
(b) “Judge” means a judge of the district court and any other
officer of the Judicial Branch of this State, including, without
limitation, a magistrate, master or referee.
Sec. 4. The provisions of subsection 1 of NRS 218D.380 do
not apply to any provision of this act which adds or revises a
requirement to submit a report to the Legislature.
Sec. 5. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*AB118*